Illinois, session 104th, SB1999.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Transportation Law of the 5Civil Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by changing 6Section 2705-590 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 2705/2705-590)8    Sec. 2705-590. Roadbuilding criteria; life-cycle cost 9analysis.10    (a) As used in this Section, "life-cycle cost" means the 11total of the cost of the initial project plus all anticipated 12future costs over the life of the pavement. Actual, relevant 13data, and not assumptions or estimates, shall be used to the 14extent such data has been collected.15    (b) The Department shall develop and implement a 16life-cycle cost analysis for each State new construction, 17reconstruction, or replacement road project under its 18jurisdiction for which the total pavement costs exceed 19$500,000 funded in whole, or in part, with State or 20State-appropriated funds. State rehabilitation and 21preservation projects shall be exempt from this requirement. 22The Department shall design and award these paving projects 23utilizing material having the lowest life-cycle cost. All   SB1999 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 11961 LNS 22054 b1pavement design life shall ensure that State and 2State-appropriated funds are utilized as efficiently as 3possible. When alternative material options are substantially 4equivalent on a life-cycle cost basis, the Department may make 5a decision based on other criteria. At the discretion of the 6Department, interstate highways with high traffic volumes or 7experimental projects may be exempt from this requirement.8    (c) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, a 9life-cycle cost analysis shall compare equivalent designs 10based upon this State's actual historic project schedules and 11costs as recorded by the pavement management system, and may 12include estimates of user costs throughout the entire pavement 13life.14    (d) For pavement projects for which this State has no 15actual historic project schedules and costs as recorded by the 16pavement management system, the Department may use actual 17historical and comparable data for equivalent designs from 18states with similar climates, soil structures, or vehicle 19traffic.20(Source: P.A. 96-715, eff. 8-25-09; 96-1000, eff. 7-2-10.) 21    Section 10. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 22changing Section 11-101-3 as follows: 23    (65 ILCS 5/11-101-3)24    Sec. 11-101-3. Noise mitigation; air quality.  SB1999 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 11961 LNS 22054 b1    (a) A municipality that has implemented a Residential 2Sound Insulation Program to mitigate aircraft noise shall 3perform indoor air quality monitoring and laboratory analysis 4of windows and doors installed pursuant to the Residential 5Sound Insulation Program to determine whether there are any 6adverse health impacts associated with off-gassing from such 7windows and doors. Such monitoring and analysis shall be 8consistent with applicable professional and industry 9standards. The municipality shall make any final reports 10resulting from such monitoring and analysis available to the 11public on the municipality's website. The municipality shall 12develop a science-based mitigation plan to address significant 13health-related impacts, if any, associated with such windows 14and doors as determined by the results of the monitoring and 15analysis. In a municipality that has implemented a Residential 16Sound Insulation Program to mitigate aircraft noise, if 17requested by the homeowner pursuant to a process established 18by the municipality, which process shall include, at a 19minimum, notification in a newspaper of general circulation 20and a mailer sent to every address identified as a recipient of 21windows and doors installed under the Residential Sound 22Insulation Program, the municipality shall replace all windows 23and doors installed under the Residential Sound Insulation 24Program in such homes where one or more windows or doors have 25been found to have caused offensive odors. Subject to 26appropriation, the municipality shall replace windows and   SB1999 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 11961 LNS 22054 b1doors in at least 750 residences a year. Residents who altered 2or modified a replacement window or accepted a replacement 3screen for the window shall not be disqualified from 4compensation or future services. Only those homeowners who 5request that the municipality perform an odor inspection as 6prescribed by the process established by the municipality 7within 6 months of notification being published and mailers 8being sent shall be eligible for odorous window and odorous 9door replacement. Residents who are eligible to receive 10replacement windows shall be allowed to choose the color and 11type of replacement window. For purposes of aiding in the 12selection of such replacement windows, a showcase and display 13of available replacement window types shall be established and 14located at Chicago Midway International Airport. Homes that 15have been identified by the municipality as having odorous 16windows or doors are not required to make said request to the 17municipality. The right to make a claim for replacement and 18have it considered pursuant to this Section shall not be 19affected by the fact of odor-related claims made or 20odor-related products received pursuant to the Residential 21Sound Insulation Program prior to June 5, 2019 (the effective 22date of this Section). The municipality shall also perform 23in-home air quality testing in residences in which windows and 24doors are replaced under this Section. In order to receive 25in-home air quality testing, a homeowner must request such 26testing from the municipality, and the total number of homes   SB1999 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 11961 LNS 22054 b1tested in any given year shall not exceed 25% of the total 2number of homes in which windows and doors were replaced under 3this Section in the prior calendar year. 4    (b) An advisory committee shall be formed, composed of the 5following: (i) 2 members of the municipality who reside in 6homes that have received windows or doors pursuant to the 7Residential Sound Insulation Program and have been identified 8by the municipality as having odorous windows or doors, 9appointed by the Secretary of Transportation; (ii) one 10employee of the Aeronautics Division of the Department of 11Transportation who shall only cast votes when breaking a tie; 12(iii) 2 employees of the municipality that implemented the 13Residential Sound Insulation Program in question; and (iv) 2 14members appointed by the Speaker of the House of 15Representatives, 2 members appointed by the President of the 16Senate, one member appointed by the Minority Leader of the 17House of Representatives, and one member appointed by the 18Minority Leader of the Senate. The advisory committee shall 19determine by majority vote which homes contain windows or 20doors that cause offensive odors and thus are eligible for 21replacement, shall promulgate a list of such homes, and shall 22develop recommendations as to the order in which homes are to 23receive window replacement. The recommendations shall include 24reasonable and objective criteria for determining which 25windows or doors are odorous, consideration of the date of 26odor confirmation for prioritization, severity of odor,   SB1999 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 11961 LNS 22054 b1geography and individual hardship, and shall provide such 2recommendations to the municipality. The advisory committee 3shall develop a process in which homeowners can demonstrate 4extreme hardship. As used in this subsection, "extreme 5hardship" means: liquid infiltration of the window or door; 6health and medical condition of the resident; and residents 7with sensitivities related to smell. At least 10% of the homes 8receiving a replacement in a year shall be homes that have 9demonstrated extreme hardship. The advisory committee shall 10compile a report demonstrating: (i) the number of homes in 11line to receive a replacement; (ii) the number of homes that 12received replacement windows or doors, or both; (iii) the 13number of homes that received financial compensation instead 14of a replacement; and (iv) the number of homes with confirmed 15mechanical issues. Until December 31, 2022, the report shall 16be compiled monthly, after December 31, 2022, the report shall 17be complied quarterly. The advisory committee shall accept all 18public questions and furnish a written response within 2 19business days. The advisory committee shall comply with the 20requirements of the Open Meetings Act. The Chicago Department 21of Aviation shall provide administrative support to the 22committee. The municipality shall consider the recommendations 23of the committee but shall retain final decision-making 24authority over replacement of windows and doors installed 25under the Residential Sound Insulation Program, and shall 26comply with all federal, State, and local laws involving   SB1999 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 11961 LNS 22054 b1procurement. A municipality administering claims pursuant to 2this Section shall provide to every address identified as 3having submitted a valid claim under this Section a quarterly 4report setting forth the municipality's activities undertaken 5pursuant to this Section for that quarter. However, the 6municipality shall replace windows and doors pursuant to this 7Section only if, and to the extent, grants are distributed to, 8and received by, the municipality from the Sound-Reducing 9Windows and Doors Replacement Fund for the costs associated 10with the replacement of sound-reducing windows and doors 11installed under the Residential Sound Insulation Program 12pursuant to Section 6z-20.1 of the State Finance Act. In 13addition, the municipality shall revise its specifications for 14procurement of windows for the Residential Sound Insulation 15Program to address potential off-gassing from such windows in 16future phases of the program. A municipality subject to the 17Section shall not legislate or otherwise regulate with regard 18to indoor air quality monitoring, laboratory analysis or 19replacement requirements, except as provided in this Section, 20but the foregoing restriction shall not limit said 21municipality's taxing power.22    (c) A home rule unit may not regulate indoor air quality 23monitoring and laboratory analysis, and related mitigation and 24mitigation plans, in a manner inconsistent with this Section. 25This Section is a limitation of home rule powers and functions 26under subsection (i) of Section 6 of Article VII of the   SB1999 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 11961 LNS 22054 b1Illinois Constitution on the concurrent exercise by home rule 2units of powers and functions exercised by the State.3    (d) This Section shall not be construed to create a 4private right of action.5(Source: P.A. 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-678, eff. 12-10-21; 6103-200, eff. 6-30-23.) 7    Section 15. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 8changing Section 11-411 as follows: 9    (625 ILCS 5/11-411)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 11-411)10    Sec. 11-411. Crash report electronic submission 11requirements forms. 12    (a) The Administrator must prepare and upon request supply 13to police departments, sheriffs and other appropriate agencies 14or individuals, the requirements for electronically submitting 15forms for written crash reports as required hereunder, 16suitable with respect to the persons required to make such 17reports and the purposes to be served. The written reports 18must call for sufficiently detailed information to disclose 19with reference to a vehicle crash the cause, conditions then 20existing, and the persons and vehicles involved or any other 21data concerning such crash that may be required for a complete 22analysis of all related circumstances and events leading to 23the crash or subsequent to the occurrence.24    (b) Every crash report required to be made in writing must   SB1999 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 11961 LNS 22054 b1be electronically submitted to the Administrator using an 2electronic format approved by the Administrator made on an 3approved form or in an approved electronic format provided by 4the Administrator and must contain all the information 5required therein unless that information is not available. The 6Department shall adopt any rules necessary to implement this 7subsection (b). 8    (c) Should special crash studies be required by the 9Administrator, the Administrator may provide the supplemental 10forms for the special studies.11(Source: P.A. 102-982, eff. 7-1-23.) 12    Section 99. Effective date. This Section and Sections 5 13and 10 take effect upon becoming law; Section 15 takes effect 14January 1, 2027.